Utah statutes.
20A-3-411.   Challenge of ballot.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a military or overseas citizen voter's ballot may be challenged in the same manner and on the same grounds as provided in this part.

(2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (1), a military or overseas citizen voter's ballot, may not be challenged because the ballot envelope has been opened and resealed if it appears from the envelope that the opening and resealing was done for the purpose of military censorship.

